Arkansas, session 2025, HB1332.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 154, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Obesity-related conditions.
(a) The Department of Human Services shall evaluate claims level data
for diagnoses frequency of obesity-related conditions including without
limitation Type 2 diabetes, pre-diabetes, cardiovascular disease, heart
failure, hypertension, chronic kidney disease, metabolic dysfunction-
associates steatohepatitis, liver disease, obstructive sleep apnea,
osteoarthritis, and other obesity-related conditions within the Medicaid
population.
(b) The department shall document the cost of these obesity-related
conditions and show trend data, year over year of the rising trends of both
*JMB089*
04-09-2025 10:44:34 JMB089

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/9/25 HB1332
the diagnoses frequency and cost to the state to present at least sixty (60)
days before a regular or fiscal legislative session to the:
(1) House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; and
(2) Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.


SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 79, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-79-169. Optional coverage for United States Food and Drug
Administration-approved anti-obesity medications — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "United States Food and Drug
Administration-approved anti-obesity medication" means a medication approved
by the United States Food and Drug Administration with an indication for
weight management in patients with chronic obesity.
(b)(1) A health benefit plan that is offered, issued, or renewed in
this state shall allow the policyholder the option to purchase coverage for
United States Food and Drug Administration-approved anti-obesity medications.
(2) The health benefit plan may adopt standards and criteria
that a covered person shall meet to be eligible for United States Food and
Drug Administration-approved anti-obesity medications consistent with
standards established by rule of the State Insurance Department.
(c) Subsection (b) of this section does not apply to a government
self-insured plan.


/s/Pilkington










04-09-2025 10:44:34 JMB089